Massachusetts, session 194th, H572.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 69 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting a new
section:
Section 1U. Subject to appropriation and in accordance with Chapter 70, the department
shall establish a health education grant program. The department shall make rules
(a) creating a grant program to assist a school district with the implementation of this
section; and;
(b) establishing the criteria for the grant program, including:
(i) an application format;
(ii) relevant timelines and deadlines
(iii) a scoring rubric, including criteria to determine a grant award amount;
of 3

(iv) allowable uses of a grant award; and
(v) any relevant data to evaluate the program that the department determines is necessary
The health education grant program shall include instruction for cardiopulmonary
resuscitation and the use of automatic external defibrillators. Instruction in hands only
cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of automatic external defibrillators must be the most
current national evidence-based Emergency Cardiovascular Care guidelines and incorporate
psychomotor skills development into the instruction. “Psychomotor skills” is defined as the use
of hands-on practicing and skills testing to support cognitive learning. A licensed teacher shall
not be required to be a certified trainer of cardiopulmonary resuscitation, to facilitate, provide or
oversee such instruction for non-certification. Courses which result in a certification being
earned are required to be taught by an authorized CPR/AED instructor.
SECTION 2. The first paragraph of section 1 of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the sixth sentence and
inserting in place thereof the following sentences:-
All public high school students shall be required to study and to demonstrate a general
knowledge of cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of automatic external defibrillators as a
prerequisite for graduation. The instruction must be based on an instructional program
established by the American Heart Association or the American Red Cross or another program
which is nationally recognized and uses the most current national evidence-based Emergency
Cardiovascular Care guidelines and incorporates psychomotor skills development into the
instruction. Psychomotor skills” is defined as the use of hands-on practicing and skills testing to
support cognitive learning. A licensed teacher shall not be required to be a certified trainer of
of 3

cardiopulmonary resuscitation, to facilitate, provide or oversee such instruction for non-
certification. Courses which result in a certification being earned are required to be taught by an
authorized CPR/AED instructor.
of 3